seg/mar.2.dix
    <pardef n="__post_unbound">

      <!-- for the sake of -->
      <e><p><l>साठी</l><r>साठी<s n="post"/><s n="adv"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      
      <!-- than -->
      <e><p><l>पेक्षा</l><r>पेक्षा<s n="post"/><s n="adv"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <!-- from -->
      <e><p><l>कडून</l><r>कडून<s n="post"/><s n="adv"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>कडच<j/></l><r>कडून<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><j/></r></p><par n="__generic_suff"/></e>

      <e><p><l>पासून</l><r>पासून<s n="post"/><s n="adv"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>पासच<j/></l><r>पासून<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><j/></r></p><par n="__generic_suff"/></e>

      <!-- to -->
      <e><p><l>कडे</l><r>कडे<s n="post"/><s n="adv"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <!-- in front of -->
      <e><p><l>पुढे</l><r>पुढे<s n="post"/><s n="adv"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>पुढच</l><r>पुढे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/></r></p><par n="__generic_suff"/></e>

      <e><p><l>समोर</l><r>समोर<s n="post"/><s n="adv"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>समोरचा</l><r>समोर<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>समोरची</l><r>समोर<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>समोरचे</l><r>समोर<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>समोरचे</l><r>समोर<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>समोरच्या</l><r>समोर<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>समोरची</l><r>समोर<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>समोरच्या</l><r>समोर<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <!-- behind -->
      <e><p><l>मागे</l><r>मागे<s n="post"/><s n="adv"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>मागील</l><r>मागील<s n="post"/><s n="adv"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>मागचा</l><r>मागे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>मागची</l><r>मागे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>मागचे</l><r>मागे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>मागचे</l><r>मागे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>मागच्या</l><r>मागे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>मागची</l><r>मागे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>मागच्या</l><r>मागे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <!-- next to -->
      <e><p><l>शेजारी</l><r>शेजारी<s n="post"/><s n="adv"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>शेजारचा</l><r>शेजारी<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>शेजारची</l><r>शेजारी<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>शेजारचे</l><r>शेजारी<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>शेजारचे</l><r>शेजारी<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>शेजारच्या</l><r>शेजारी<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>शेजारची</l><r>शेजारी<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>शेजारच्या</l><r>शेजारी<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <!-- across -->
      <e><p><l>पलीकडे</l><r>पलीकडे<s n="post"/><s n="adv"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>पलीकडचा</l><r>पलीकडे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>पलीकडची</l><r>पलीकडे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>पलीकडचे</l><r>पलीकडे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>पलीकडचे</l><r>पलीकडे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>पलीकडच्या</l><r>पलीकडे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>पलीकडची</l><r>पलीकडे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>पलीकडच्या</l><r>पलीकडे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <!-- this side -->
      <e><p><l>अलीकडे</l><r>अलीकडे<s n="post"/><s n="adv"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>अलीकडचा</l><r>अलीकडे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>अलीकडची</l><r>अलीकडे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>अलीकडचे</l><r>अलीकडे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>अलीकडचे</l><r>अलीकडे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>अलीकडच्या</l><r>अलीकडे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>अलीकडची</l><r>अलीकडे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>अलीकडच्या</l><r>अलीकडे<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <!-- about -->
      <e><p><l>संबंधी</l><r>संबंधी<s n="post"/><s n="adv"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>संबंधीचा</l><r>संबंधी<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>संबंधीची</l><r>संबंधी<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>संबंधीचे</l><r>संबंधी<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>संबंधीचे</l><r>संबंधी<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>संबंधीच्या</l><r>संबंधी<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>संबंधीची</l><r>संबंधी<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>संबंधीच्या</l><r>संबंधी<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <!-- out of -->
      <e><p><l>पैकी</l><r>पैकी<s n="post"/><s n="adv"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>पैकीचा</l><r>पैकी<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>पैकीची</l><r>पैकी<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>पैकीचे</l><r>पैकी<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>पैकीचे</l><r>पैकी<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>पैकीच्या</l><r>पैकी<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>पैकीची</l><r>पैकी<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>पैकीच्या</l><r>पैकी<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="obl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

      <!-- from above -->
      <e><p><l>वरून</l><r>वरून<s n="post"/><s n="adv"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>वरचा</l><r>वरून<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>वरची</l><r>वरून<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>वरचे</l><r>वरून<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
      <e><p><l>वरचे</l><r>वरून<s n="post"/><s n="attr"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

    <e lm="">                 <i></i><par n="__post_unbound"/></e>
